Utah statutes.
9-6-408.   Division responsible for maintenance and security.

The division is responsible, in cooperation with the contracting agency, for the conservation, maintenance, and security of all works of art placed in or at each state building or facility under the program.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

